Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1520
Tribal customary adoption; written adoption assistance agreement; access to resources.

The tribe of an Indian child who is subject to a pending tribal customary adoption may work in consultation with the department as the department works with the proposed tribal customary adoptive parents to finalize the written adoption assistance agreement as described in section 43-118.02 in order to ensure that the Indian child has access to all available state, federal, and tribal resources for which such child is or will be eligible after the decree of adoption, including, but not limited to, services through the Indian Health Service.

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 25.
July 18, 2026